th: ตำแหน่งลายเซ็น: หลัง; หน้าปก; ภายนอก; ด้านหน้า; ภายใน; หลายรายการ; เฉพาะหน้า; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Поставяне на подпис: Отзад; Корица; Екстериор; Отпред; Интериор; От няколко страни; Конкретна страница; Други
hr-HR: Mjesto potpisa: Straga; Naslovnica; Izvana; Sprijeda; Unutra; Višestruko; Određena stranica; Ostalo
nb: Signaturplassering: Rygg; Dekke; Ytre; Front; Interiør; Flere; Spesifikk side; Annen
de: Platzierung der Unterschrift: Rücken; Cover; Außen; Vorne; Inneneinrichtung; Mehrere; Bestimmte Seite; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Disposição da assinatura: Costas; Capa; Exterior; Dianteira; Interior; Múltiplo; Página específica; Outro
ko: 서명 위치: 등; 커버; 외부; 앞쪽; 인테리어; 멀티; 특정 페이지; 기타
es: Ubicación de la firma: Espalda; Portada; Exterior; Frontal; Interior; Multiple; Página específica; Otros
pl: Lokalizacja podpisu: Wstecz; Okładka; Części zewnętrzne; Przód; Wnętrze; Wiele; Konkretna strona; Pozostałe
tr: İmza Yerleştirme: Sırt; Kapak; Dış; Ön taraf; İç mekan; Çoklu; Belirli sayfa; Diğer
lt-LT: Parašo vieta: Galas; Viršelis; Išorė; Priekis; Interjeras; Kelios vietos; Konkretus puslapis; Kita
zh-CN: 签名位置: 背部; 封面; 外部; 前; 内部; 多个; 特定页面; 其他
ru: Размещение подписи: Сзади; Обложка; Внешняя сторона; Передняя сторона; Внутренняя сторона; Несколько; Конкретная страница; Другое
it: Posizione della firma: Schiena; Copertina; Esterna; Anteriore; Interna; Multipla; Pagina specifica; Altro
sk-SK: Umiestnenie podpisu: Zadný; Kryt; Vonkajšie; Predný; Interiér; Viacnásobný; Konkrétna stránka; Iné
hu: Aláírás elhelyezése: Hátul; Borító; Külső; Elöl; Belső; Többszörös; Konkrét oldal; Egyéb
zh-TW: 簽名位置: 後退; 封面; 外部的; 前; 室內; 多重; 特定頁面; 其他
sl-SI: Lokacija podpisa: Zadaj; Naslovnica; Zunanjost; Spredaj; Notranjost; Več mest; Določena stran; Drugo
da: Signaturplacering: Ryg; Cover; Eksteriør; Front; Interiør; Flere; Specifik side; Andet
sv: Signaturplacering: Rygg; Omslag; Exteriör; Front; Interiör; Flera olika; Specifik sida; Annat
ro-RO: Plasarea semnăturii: Spate; Copertă; Exterior; Față; Interior; Multiplă; Pagina specifică; Altele
en: Signature placement: Back; Cover; Exterior; Front; Interior; Multiple; Specific page; Other
pt-PT: Posicionamento de assinatura: Costas; Capa; Exterior; Parte dianteira; Interior; Múltiplo; Página específica; Outro
vi: Vị trí chữ ký: Lưng; Che phủ; Bên ngoài; Trước; Nội thất; Nhiều; Trang cụ thể; Khác
ja: 署名の配置: 背中; 表紙; エクステリア; フロント; インテリア; 複数; 特定のページ; その他
fr: Emplacement de la signature: Dos; Couverture; Extérieur; Avant; Intérieur; Multiple; Page spécifique; Autre
nl: Plaatsing handtekening: Rug; Omslag; Exterieur; Voorkant; Interieur; Meerdere; Specifieke pagina; Andere
el: Τοποθέτηση υπογραφής: Πλάτη; Κάλυμμα; Εξωτερικός; Μπροστά; Εσωτερικό; Πολλαπλή; Συγκεκριμένη σελίδα; Άλλο
cs: Umístění podpisu: Záda; Obálka; Exteriér; Předek; Interiér; Více; Konkrétní stránka; Jiné
fi: Allekirjoituksen sijoittelu: Selkä; Kansi; Ulkopuoli; Etuosa; Sisäosa; Useita; Tietty sivu; Muu